Nevada, session 83, SB469.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. 1. There is hereby appropriated from the State
General Fund to the Department of Corrections for the Northern
Nevada Correctional Center budget account for the replacement of
security and safety equipment the following sums:
For the Fiscal Year 2025-2026 .................................... $36,982
For the Fiscal Year 2026-2027 .................................... $34,980
2. Any balance of the sums appropriated by subsection 1
remaining at the end of the respective fiscal years must not be
committed for expenditure after June 30 of the respective fiscal
years by the entity to which the appropriation is made or any entity
to which money from the appropriation is granted or otherwise
transferred in any manner, and any portion of the appropriated
money remaining must not be spent for any purpose after
September 18, 2026, and September 17, 2027, respectively, by
either the entity to which the money was appropriated or the entity
to which the money was subsequently granted or transferred, and
must be reverted to the State General Fund on or before
September 18, 2026, and September 17, 2027, respectively.
Sec. 2. 1. There is hereby appropriated from the State
General Fund to the Department of Corrections for the Northern
Nevada Correctional Center budget account for the replacement of
culinary, maintenance and building equipment the following sums:
For the Fiscal Year 2025-2026 .................................. $108,047
For the Fiscal Year 2026-2027 ...................................... $4,512
2. Any balance of the sums appropriated by subsection 1
remaining at the end of the respective fiscal years must not be
committed for expenditure after June 30 of the respective fiscal
years by the entity to which the appropriation is made or any entity
to which money from the appropriation is granted or otherwise
transferred in any manner, and any portion of the appropriated
money remaining must not be spent for any purpose after
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 2 –
September 18, 2026, and September 17, 2027, respectively, by
either the entity to which the money was appropriated or the entity
to which the money was subsequently granted or transferred, and
must be reverted to the State General Fund on or before
September 18, 2026, and September 17, 2027, respectively.
Sec. 3. 1. There is hereby appropriated from the State
General Fund to the Department of Corrections for the Southern
Desert Correctional Center budget account for the replacement of
utility vehicles, handheld metal detectors and other small equipment
the following sums:
For the Fiscal Year 2025-2026 .................................. $236,583
For the Fiscal Year 2026-2027 .................................... $14,230
2. Any balance of the sums appropriated by subsection 1
remaining at the end of the respective fiscal years must not be
committed for expenditure after June 30 of the respective fiscal
years by the entity to which the appropriation is made or any entity
to which money from the appropriation is granted or otherwise
transferred in any manner, and any portion of the appropriated
money remaining must not be spent for any purpose after
September 18, 2026, and September 17, 2027, respectively, by
either the entity to which the money was appropriated or the entity
to which the money was subsequently granted or transferred, and
must be reverted to the State General Fund on or before
September 18, 2026, and September 17, 2027, respectively.
Sec. 4. There is hereby appropriated from the State General
Fund to the Department of Corrections for the Northern Nevada
Correctional Center budget account the sum of $49,900 for the
replacement of gymnasium flooring.
Sec. 5. There is hereby appropriated from the State General
Fund to the Department of Corrections for the Northern Nevada
Correctional Center budget account the sum of $278,386 for the
replacement of utility vehicles and warehouse equipment.
Sec. 6. There is hereby appropriated from the State General
Fund to the Department of Corrections for the Southern Desert
Correctional Center budget account the sum of $78,411 for deferred
maintenance projects.
Sec. 7. There is hereby appropriated from the State General
Fund to the Department of Corrections for the Southern Desert
Correctional Center budget account the sum of $19,275 for the
replacement of office furniture and visiting room chairs.
Sec. 8. There is hereby appropriated from the State General
Fund to the Department of Corrections for the Southern Desert
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 3 –
Correctional Center budget account the sum of $120,434 for the
replacement of warehouse, maintenance and security equipment.
Sec. 9. Any remaining balance of the appropriations made by
sections 4 to 8, inclusive, of this act must not be committed for
expenditure after June 30, 2027, by the entity to which the
appropriation is made or any entity to which money from the
appropriation is granted or otherwise transferred in any manner, and
any portion of the appropriated money remaining must not be spent
for any purpose after September 17, 2027, by either the entity to
which the money was appropriated or the entity to which the money
was subsequently granted or transferred, and must be reverted to the
State General Fund on or before September 17, 2027.
Sec. 10. This act becomes effective on July 1, 2025.
20 ~~~~~ 25
-
83rd Session (2025)